Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Chapter 8. Register of Safety and Health Law Violators.

§§ 40.1-135 through 40.1-138.

Not effective.

Editor’s note.

These sections were enacted by Acts 1991, c. 662, cl. 1, and Acts 1991, c. 662, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1992, c. 798, cl. 1, provided that the provisions of the 1991 act would not become effective unless reenacted by the 1993 Session of the General Assembly. The 1991 act was not reenacted at the 1993 Session.